Nevada, session 83, SB403.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. There is hereby created the Subcommittee on Metrics of
the Commission on Innovation and Excellence in Education,
consisting of members appointed by the Chair of the Commission.
The Subcommittee shall, in collaboration with the Department,
develop metrics that local educational agencies and schools may
use to measure the progress and success of pupils, schools and
school districts, including, without limitation:
(a) Metrics for learning outcomes which are based on growth,
including, without limitation, the development of skills,
competencies and dispositions.
(b) Metrics of holistic factors, including, without limitation,
the well-being of pupils, social capital and civic engagement.
2. Each member of the Subcommittee:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 4 –
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Subcommittee, is
entitled to receive the travel expenses provided for state officers
and employees generally.
Sec. 2. NRS 385.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.900 As used in this section and NRS 385.910 and 385.920,
and section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
“Commission” means the Commission on Innovation and
Excellence in Education created by NRS 385.910.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 385.910 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.910 1. The Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education is hereby created. The Commission consists of:
(a) Three members who are Senators, two of whom are
appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate and one of whom is
appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(b) Three members who are members of the Assembly, two of
whom are appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one of
whom is appointed by the Minority Leader of the Assembly;
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(d) The Director of the Office of Finance;
(e) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education;
(f) One member who is a representative of the State Board of
Education, appointed by the President of the State Board;
(g) One member who is a teacher and member of the Nevada
State Education Association, appointed by the President of that
Association;
(h) One member who is a teacher and member of the Clark
County Education Association, appointed by the President of that
Association;
(i) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Administrators;
(j) One member who is a member of the board of trustees of a
school district, appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Boards;
(k) One member who is a superintendent of schools of a school
district, appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents;
(l) One member who is the chief financial officer of a school
district, appointed by the Association of School Business Officials
International;
(m) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of
Counties;
(n) One member appointed by the Nevada League of Cities;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 5 –
(o) One member who is the representative of an organization
that advocates for public education, appointed by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction;
(p) One member who is the parent or guardian of a pupil who is
enrolled in a public school in this State, appointed by the Nevada
Parent Teacher Association;
(q) One member who is a representative of the public at large,
appointed by the Governor;
(r) Two members who own or manage a business located in this
State, appointed by the Governor; [and]
(s) One member who serves on the Commission on School
Funding created by NRS 387.1246 [.] ;
(t) The dean of the College of Education and Human
Development at the University of Nevada, Reno, or his or her
designee;
(u) The dean of the College of Education at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, or his or her designee; and
(v) The dean of the School of Education at Nevada State
University, or his or her designee.
2. In appointing the members of the Commission described in
paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection 1, the appointing authorities
shall coordinate the appointments so that:
(a) One member is a teacher in an elementary school and one
member is a teacher in a secondary school, respectively; and
(b) One member is a teacher in a public school in an urban
setting and one member is a teacher in a public school in a rural
setting, respectively.
 The appointing authorities shall, in appointing a member at the
beginning of each term, alternate the characteristics described in
paragraphs (a) and (b) so that each member appointed to the
Commission does not possess the same characteristic in consecutive
terms.
3. If any organization listed in subsection 1 ceases to exist, the
appointment required pursuant to that subsection must be made by
the organization’s successor in interest or, if there is no successor in
interest, by the Governor.
4. In appointing the members of the Commission described in
subsection 1, the appointing authorities shall coordinate the
appointments when practicable so that the members of the
Commission represent the diversity of this State, including, without
limitation, regional, ethnic, economic and gender diversity.
5. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
-
*SB403_R2*

– 6 –
(b) While engaged in the business of the Commission, is entitled
to receive the travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
6. Each appointed member of the Commission serves a term of
2 years and may be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in the
same manner as the original appointment. Any vacancy occurring in
the membership of the Commission must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days after the
vacancy occurs.
7. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall call the first
meeting of the Commission. At its first meeting and annually
thereafter, the members of the Commission shall elect a Chair and a
Vice Chair from among the members of the Commission.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once each calendar
quarter and as needed at the call of the Chair.
9. The Commission may appoint subcommittees to address
designated projects or consider specific problems or other matters
that are related to and within the scope of the functions of the
Commission, as the Commission determines necessary to carry out
the duties of the Commission.
10. The Department shall provide any administrative support
necessary for the Commission to carry out its duties.
Sec. 3. NRS 388.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 388D.330, boards of trustees of school districts shall schedule
and provide a minimum of 180 days of free school in the districts
under their charge.
2. [Except for an alternative schedule described in subsection
3, the] The Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon
application by the board of trustees of a school district, authorize the
school district to provide a program of instruction based on an
alternative schedule , which may include, without limitation, a
reduction in the number of school days, if the number of minutes
of instruction to be provided is equal to or greater than the number
of minutes of instruction that would be provided in a program of
instruction consisting of 180 school days. The Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall notify the board of trustees of the school
district of the approval or denial of the application not later than 30
days after the Superintendent of Public Instruction receives the
application. An alternative schedule proposed pursuant to this
subsection must be developed in accordance with chapter 288 of
NRS.
3. [The Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon
application by the board of trustees of a school district, authorize a
reduction of not more than 15 school days in that particular district
-
*SB403_R2*

– 7 –
to establish or maintain an alternative schedule consisting of a 12-
month school program if the board of trustees demonstrates that the
proposed alternative schedule for the program provides for a number
of minutes of instruction that is equal to or greater than that which
would be provided under a program consisting of 180 school days.
4.] The Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon
application by a board of trustees, authorize the addition of minutes
of instruction to any scheduled day of free school if days of free
school are lost because of any interscholastic activity. Not more than
5 days of free school so lost may be rescheduled in this manner. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to an alternative schedule
approved pursuant to subsection 2.
[5.] 4. The number of minutes of instruction required for a
particular group of pupils in a program of instruction based on an
alternative schedule approved pursuant to this section and NRS
388.095 and 388.097 must be determined by multiplying the
appropriate minimum daily period of instruction established by the
State Board by regulation for that particular group of pupils by 180.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.1. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4.2 to 4.6, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 4.2. 1. Not later than July 1, 2040, and at least once
every 5 years thereafter, the Department shall review and, as
necessary, revise the Portrait of a Nevada Learner to align with
the educational needs of this State.
2. As used in this section, “Portrait of a Nevada Learner”
means the document with that title which was developed by the
Department of Education through public engagement and
originally published in June 2023.
Sec. 4.3. 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils may submit an application to the
Department to provide a program of personalized, competency-
based learning. In addition, a committee to form a charter school
or charter management organization may submit an application to
the Department to provide a program of personalized, competency-
based learning if the application to form the charter school
submitted by the committee or the organization pursuant to NRS
388A.246 indicates that the charter school intends to provide a
program of personalized, competency-based learning.
2. An application to provide a program of personalized,
competency-based learning must include:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Department that the program
satisfies all applicable statutes and regulations;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 8 –
(b) A description of how the program will ensure access to
technology for pupils and teachers or other school employees and
communicate with pupils, their families and staff regarding the
program of personalized, competency-based learning; and
(c) Such other information as the State Board may require by
regulation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Department shall approve an application submitted pursuant to
this section if the application satisfies the requirements of
NRS 389.200 and sections 4.3 to 4.6, inclusive, of this act and all
other applicable statutes and regulations. The Department shall
deny an application to provide a program of personalized,
competency-based learning submitted by a committee to form a
charter school or a charter management organization if the
Department denies the application to form a charter school
submitted by the committee or organization. The Department shall
provide written notice to the applicant of the Department’s
approval or denial of the application.
4. If the Department denies an application submitted
pursuant to this section, the Department shall include in the
written notice provided pursuant to subsection 3 the reasons for
the denial and the deficiencies of the application. The applicant
must be granted 30 days after receipt of the written notice to
correct any deficiencies identified in the written notice and
resubmit the application. The Department shall approve an
application that has been resubmitted pursuant to this subsection
if the application satisfies the requirements of NRS 389.200 and
sections 4.3 to 4.6, inclusive, of this act and all other applicable
statutes and regulations.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils that provides a program of personalized,
competency-based learning shall:
(a) Develop a plan for conducting the program of
personalized, competency-based learning.
(b) At least 45 days before the first day of each school year,
present the plan for conducting the program of personalized,
competency-based learning to the public at a public meeting or, if
the plan was developed by the governing body of a charter school
or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, to the sponsor of
the school.
(c) Make a copy of the plan for conducting the program of
personalized, competency-based learning available to the school
community, including, without limitation, parents and employees
-
*SB403_R2*

– 9 –
of the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable.
Sec. 4.4. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils that provides a program of personalized,
competency-based learning shall ensure that the persons who
operate the program on a day-to-day basis comply with and carry
out all applicable requirements, statutes, regulations and rules and
policies of the school district, charter school or university school
for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, including, without
limitation:
1. Requirements for graduation;
2. The accountability of public schools pursuant to chapter
385A of NRS;
3. Provisions governing the attendance and truancy of pupils,
including, without limitation, NRS 392.040 to 392.220, inclusive;
4. The discipline of pupils; and
5. Requirements for assessing the achievement of pupils,
including, without limitation, the administration of the
examinations required by NRS 390.105 and, if applicable for the
grade levels of the pupils enrolled, the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.
Sec. 4.5. 1. A program of personalized, competency-based
learning may be provided on an alternative schedule, including,
without limitation:
(a) Shorter or longer school days than are regularly provided
for in the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils.
(b) Attendance by pupils during any part of the calendar year.
2. If a program of personalized, competency-based learning is
provided for pupils on a full-time basis, the program must include
at least as many hours or minutes of instruction as would be
provided under a program consisting of 180 days or an alternative
number of days which the State Board may prescribe by
regulation.
3. A pupil who is enrolled full-time in a program of
personalized, competency-based learning and who demonstrates
sufficient proficiency to meet the objectives of a course of
instruction may complete the course in a shorter period of time
than is normally allotted for the course.
Sec. 4.6. The State Board shall adopt regulations necessary
to carry out the provisions of NRS 389.200 and sections 4.3, 4.4
and 4.5 of this act.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 10 –
Sec. 5. NRS 389.041 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.041 1. The State Board shall, by regulation, establish a
course of study in occupational guidance and counseling.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall establish
the curriculum for the course of study in that district. The
curriculum must be organized and, with the assistance of teachers,
administrators, pupils, parents and the business community,
coordinated by licensed school counselors who shall provide
instruction and activities designed to:
(a) Promote normal growth and development.
(b) Promote positive mental and physical health.
(c) Provide each pupil with knowledge and skills which permit
the pupil to control his or her own destiny.
(d) Assist each pupil to plan, monitor and manage the pupil’s
personal, educational and occupational development.
(e) Meet the immediate needs and concerns of each pupil,
whether the pupil’s needs or concerns require counseling,
consultation, referral or information.
(f) Provide counselors, teachers and support staff with the
knowledge and skills required to maintain and improve the course.
(g) Provide such other related assistance and instruction as is
deemed necessary.
3. The instruction required by this section must be made
available for each pupil in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.
4. The board of trustees in each school district shall organize
and offer the curriculum within the limits of money made available
to the district by the Legislature for that purpose.
5. A local educational agency, as defined in 20 U.S.C. §
7801(30)(A), may develop, maintain and publish on an Internet
website maintained by the local educational agency
recommendations for educational materials and information
regarding career exploration suitable for pupils in grades 1 to 5,
inclusive.
Sec. 5.5. NRS 389.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.171 1. A pupil may be granted credit for a specific
course of study without having attended the regularly scheduled
classes in the course if the pupil demonstrates his or her proficiency
to meet the:
(a) Objectives of the course through the pupil’s performance on
an examination prescribed by the State Board;
(b) Objectives of a particular area or areas of the course in
which the pupil is deficient through the pupil’s performance on an
examination developed by the principal and the pupil’s teacher who
provides instruction in the course that is designed to measure the
proficiency of the pupil in that particular area or areas; or
-
*SB403_R2*

– 11 –
(c) Objectives of the course through the pupil’s performance on
an examination that the principal determines is as rigorous or more
rigorous than the examination prescribed by the State Board
pursuant to paragraph (a), including, without limitation, an advanced
placement examination in the subject area of the course . [;
(d) Objectives of the course through a portfolio of the pupil’s
work;
(e) Objectives of a particular area or areas of the course through
the pupil’s performance of a task that is designed to measure the
proficiency of the pupil in that particular area or areas; or
(f) Objectives of the course as measured against the criteria
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 2.]
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe the:
(a) Form on which a pupil may apply to the board of trustees of
a school district in which the pupil attends school or the governing
body of the charter school in which the pupil is enrolled to be
granted credit pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Courses of study for which pupils may be granted credit
pursuant to subsection 1;
(c) Minimum score on the examination prescribed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that is required to demonstrate
proficiency in a course; and
(d) Criteria, other than the criteria described in paragraphs (a)
[to (e), inclusive,] , (b) and (c) of subsection 1, that may be used to
determine whether a pupil has achieved proficiency in a course.
Sec. 6. NRS 389.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.200 As used in NRS 389.200 [, 389.210 and 389.230,
“competency-based education”] and sections 4.3 to 4.6, inclusive,
of this act, “personalized, competency-based learning” means a
system of [instruction by] learning in which [a] :
1. A pupil advances [to a higher level of learning when the
pupil demonstrates] through courses based on evidence of mastery
[of a concept or skill, regardless of the time, place or pace at which
the pupil progresses.] or competence;
2. A pupil makes important decisions about his or her
learning experience on a daily basis, including, without limitation,
how the pupil will create and apply knowledge and demonstrate
mastery or competence in a concept or skill;
3. A pupil receives differentiated support based on his or her
individual learning progress, such that learning may be
accelerated or remediation may be provided;
4. A pupil learns actively using different pathways and varied
pacing; and
-
*SB403_R2*

– 12 –
5. Expectations for learning are rigorous, transparent,
measureable and transferable.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8.5. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Department of Education shall adopt by regulation a
definition of “work-based learning opportunity” for the purposes
of any agreement between the Office and an applicant for an
abatement, a partial abatement or transferable tax credits that
incorporates a plan by the applicant to provide such opportunities
to pupils enrolled in public high schools in this State, including,
without limitation, an agreement entered into pursuant to NRS
231.1555, 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753, 360.754,
360.759, 360.889 or 360.945.
Sec. 9. NRS 231.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.037 The Board shall:
1. Review and evaluate all programs of economic development
in this State and make recommendations to the Legislature for
legislation to [improve] :
(a) Improve the effectiveness of those programs in
implementing the State Plan for Economic Development developed
by the Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
(b) Provide incentives for businesses, including small
businesses, to provide opportunities for career exploration to
pupils enrolled in public high schools in this State.
2. Recommend to the Executive Director a State Plan for
Economic Development and make recommendations to the
Executive Director for carrying out the State Plan for Economic
Development, including, without limitation, recommendations
regarding the development and implementation of a recruiting and
marketing effort to attract professionals and businesses to this State.
3. Recommend to the Executive Director the criteria for the
designation of regional development authorities.
4. Make recommendations to the Executive Director for the
designation for the southern region of this State, the northern region
of this State and the rural region of this State, one or more regional
development authorities for each region.
5. Provide advice and recommendations to the Executive
Director concerning:
(a) The procedures to be followed by any entity seeking to
obtain any development resource, allocation, grant or loan from the
Office;
(b) The criteria to be used by the Office in providing
development resources and making allocations, grants and loans;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 13 –
(c) The requirements for reports from the recipients of
development resources, allocations, grants and loans from the Office
concerning the use thereof;
(d) The development and implementation of programs to
provide customized workforce development services to existing and
prospective businesses in this State; and
(e) Any other activities of the Office.
6. Review each proposal by the Executive Director to enter into
a contract pursuant to NRS 231.057 for more than $100,000 or
allocate, grant or loan more than $100,000 to any entity and, as the
Board determines to be in the best interests of the State, approve or
disapprove the proposed allocation, grant or loan. Notwithstanding
any other statutory provision to the contrary, the Executive Director
shall not enter into any contract pursuant to NRS 231.057 for more
than $100,000 or make any allocation, grant or loan of more than
$100,000 to any entity unless the allocation, grant or loan is
approved by the Board.
7. Review and make recommendations to the Department of
Education regarding technologies to facilitate the exploration by
pupils of careers in industries in this State.
Sec. 10. NRS 231.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1555 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fee imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. After considering any advice and recommendations of the
Board, the Executive Director shall establish:
(a) Procedures for applying to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which must:
(1) Include, without limitation, a requirement that the
applicant set forth in the application:
(I) The proposed use of the transferable tax credits;
(II) The plans, projects and programs for which the
transferable tax credits will be used;
(III) The expected benefits of the issuance of the
transferable tax credits; and
(IV) A statement of the short-term and long-term impacts
of the issuance of the transferable tax credits; and
(2) Allow the applicant to revise the application upon the
recommendation of the Executive Director.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 14 –
(b) The criteria which a person to whom a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits has been issued must satisfy to
be issued a certificate of transferable tax credits. Such criteria may
include, without limitation, a requirement for the applicant to
enter into an agreement with the Office that incorporates a plan
by the applicant to provide work-based learning opportunities to
pupils enrolled in public high schools in this State, which may
include, without limitation, a proposal to offer work-based
learning opportunities at the business of the applicant or to
provide for employees of the applicant to serve as full-time or part-
time instructors for career and technical education courses.
3. After receipt of an application pursuant to this section, the
Executive Director shall review and evaluate the application and
determine whether the approval of the application would promote
the economic development of this State and aid the implementation
of the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
4. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount of $100,000 or less, the Executive Director may approve the
application, subject to the provisions of subsection 6, if the
Executive Director determines that approving the application will
promote the economic development of this State and aid the
implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development.
5. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount greater than $100,000, the Executive Director shall submit
the application and the Executive Director’s review and evaluation
of the application pursuant to subsection 3 to the Board, and the
Board may approve the application, subject to the provisions of
subsection 6, if the Board determines that approving the application
will promote the economic development of this State and aid the
implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development.
6. The Executive Director or the Board shall not approve any
application for transferable tax credits for:
(a) A period of more than 5 fiscal years;
(b) Fiscal Year 2015-2016; or
(c) Any fiscal year if the approval of the application would
cause the total amount of transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
this section to exceed:
(1) For Fiscal Year 2016-2017, $1,000,000.
(2) For Fiscal Year 2017-2018, $2,000,000.
(3) For Fiscal Year 2018-2019, $2,000,000.
(4) For Fiscal Year 2019-2020, $3,000,000.
(5) For a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2020,
$5,000,000.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 15 –
7. If the Executive Director or the Board approves an
application and issues a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the
tax credits available pursuant to this section to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department of Taxation; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
8. Within 14 days after the Office determines that a person to
whom a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits has been
issued satisfies the criteria established by the Executive Director
pursuant to subsection 2, the Office shall notify the person that
transferable tax credits will be issued. Within 30 days after the
receipt of the notice, the person shall make an irrevocable
declaration of the amount of transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of
subsection 1, thereby accounting for all of the credits which will be
issued. Upon receipt of the declaration, the Office shall issue to the
person a certificate of transferable tax credits in the amount
approved by the Executive Director or the Board, as applicable, for
the fees or taxes included in the declaration. The Office shall notify
the Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board
of all transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, and the
amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
Sec. 11. NRS 274.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.310 1. A person who intends to locate a business in this
State within:
(a) A historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15
U.S.C. § 632;
(b) A redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of
NRS;
(c) An area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570; or
(d) An enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597,
 may submit a request to the governing body of the county, city or
town in which the business would operate for an endorsement of an
application by the person to the Office of Economic Development
for a partial abatement of one or more of the taxes imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS or the local sales and use taxes. The
governing body of the county, city or town shall provide notice of
the request to the board of trustees of the school district in which the
business would operate. The notice must set forth the date, time and
location of the hearing at which the governing body will consider
-
*SB403_R2*

– 16 –
whether to endorse the application. As used in this subsection,
“local sales and use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross
receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal property
sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political
subdivision in which the business is located, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which states:
(1) The date on which the abatement becomes effective, as
agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be earlier
than the date on which the Office received the application and not
later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves the
application; and
(2) That the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective:
(I) Commence operation and continue in operation in the
historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §
632, redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of NRS,
area eligible for a community development block grant pursuant to
24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community established pursuant to
24 C.F.R. Part 597 for a period specified by the Office, which must
be at least 5 years; and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection.
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 17 –
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business will operate.
(d) The applicant invested or commits to invest a minimum of
$500,000 in capital assets that will be retained at the location of the
business in the historically underutilized business zone, as defined
in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter
279 of NRS, area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community established
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597 until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
4. The Office of Economic Development may require the
agreement described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 to
incorporate a plan by the business to provide work-based learning
opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high schools in this
State, which may include, without limitation, a proposal to offer
work-based learning opportunities at the business or to provide for
employees of the business to serve as full-time or part-time
instructors for career and technical education courses.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall immediately
forward a certificate of eligibility for the abatement to:
(a) The Department of Taxation;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of the county
in which the business will be located.
[5.] 6. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
[6.] 7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
[7.] 8. If a business whose partial abatement has been
approved pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 18 –
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation or, if the
partial abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the
partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before
the failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
[8.] 9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary or advisable to
carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 12. NRS 274.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.320 1. A person who intends to expand a business in this
State within:
(a) A historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15
U.S.C. § 632;
(b) A redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of
NRS;
(c) An area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570; or
(d) An enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597,
 may submit a request to the governing body of the county, city or
town in which the business operates for an endorsement of an
application by the person to the Office of Economic Development
for a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
capital equipment. The governing body of the county, city or town
shall provide notice of the request to the board of trustees of the
school district in which the business operates. The notice must set
forth the date, time and location of the hearing at which the
governing body will consider whether to endorse the application. As
used in this subsection, “local sales and use taxes” means the taxes
-
*SB403_R2*

– 19 –
imposed on the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of
tangible personal property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise
consumed, in the political subdivision in which the business is
located, except the taxes imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and
the Local School Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which states:
(1) The date on which the abatement becomes effective, as
agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be earlier
than the date on which the Office received the application and not
later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves the
application; and
(2) That the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective:
(I) Continue in operation in the historically underutilized
business zone, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area
created pursuant to chapter 279 of NRS, area eligible for a
community development block grant pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570
or enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597
for a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years;
and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection.
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
-
*SB403_R2*

– 20 –
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) The applicant invested or commits to invest a minimum of
$250,000 in capital equipment that will be retained at the location of
the business in the historically underutilized business zone, as
defined in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area created pursuant to
chapter 279 of NRS, area eligible for a community development
block grant pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community
established pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597 until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
4. The Office of Economic Development may require the
agreement described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 to
incorporate a plan by the business to provide work-based learning
opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high schools in this
State, which may include, without limitation, a proposal to offer
work-based learning opportunities at the business or to provide for
employees of the business to serve as full-time or part-time
instructors for career and technical education courses.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall immediately
forward a certificate of eligibility for the abatement to:
(a) The Department of Taxation; and
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission.
[5.] 6. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
[6.] 7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
[7.] 8. If a business whose partial abatement has been
approved pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
-
*SB403_R2*

– 21 –
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation the
amount of the partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this
section before the failure of the business to comply unless the
Nevada Tax Commission determines that the business has
substantially complied with the requirements of this section. Except
as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business
shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement required to
be paid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount due
at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for
each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the month
following the period for which the payment would have been made
had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
[8.] 9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary or advisable to
carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 13. NRS 274.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.330 1. A person who owns a business which is located
within an enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597 in this State may submit a request to the governing body of
the county, city or town in which the business is located for an
endorsement of an application by the person to the Office of
Economic Development for a partial abatement of one or more of
the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS or the local sales
and use taxes. The governing body of the county, city or town shall
provide notice of the request to the board of trustees of the school
district in which the business operates. The notice must set forth the
date, time and location of the hearing at which the governing body
will consider whether to endorse the application. As used in this
subsection, “local sales and use taxes” means the taxes imposed on
the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the
political subdivision in which the business is located, except the
taxes imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 22 –
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which states:
(1) The date on which the abatement becomes effective, as
agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be earlier
than the date on which the Office received the application and not
later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves the
application; and
(2) That the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective:
(I) Continue in operation in the enterprise community for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years; and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection.
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) The business:
(1) Employs one or more dislocated workers who reside in
the enterprise community; and
(2) Pays such employees a wage of not less than 100 percent
of the federally designated level signifying poverty for a family of
four persons and provides medical benefits to the employees and
their dependents which meet the minimum requirements for medical
benefits established by the Office.
4. The Office of Economic Development may require the
agreement described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 to
incorporate a plan by the business to provide work-based learning
opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high schools in this
State, which may include, without limitation, a proposal to offer
work-based learning opportunities at the business or to provide for
-
*SB403_R2*

– 23 –
employees of the business to serve as full-time or part-time
instructors for career and technical education courses.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall:
(a) Determine the percentage of employees of the business
which meet the requirements of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 and
grant a partial abatement equal to that percentage; and
(b) Immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(1) The Department of Taxation;
(2) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(3) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of the county
in which the business is located.
[5.] 6. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
[6.] 7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
[7.] 8. If a business whose partial abatement has been
approved pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation or, if the
partial abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the
partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before
the failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
-
*SB403_R2*

– 24 –
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
[8.] 9. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall adopt regulations relating to the minimum level of
benefits that a business must provide to its employees to qualify for
an abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Office determines to
be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
[10.] 11. As used in this section, “dislocated worker” means a
person who:
(a) Has been terminated, laid off or received notice of
termination or layoff from employment;
(b) Is eligible for or receiving or has exhausted his or her
entitlement to unemployment compensation;
(c) Has been dependent on the income of another family
member but is no longer supported by that income;
(d) Has been self-employed but is no longer receiving an income
from self-employment because of general economic conditions in
the community or natural disaster; or
(e) Is currently unemployed and unable to return to a previous
industry or occupation.
Sec. 14. NRS 360.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.750 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the:
(a) New business pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
(b) Expanded business pursuant to chapter 361 or 363B of NRS
or a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
the expanded business. As used in this paragraph, “local sales and
use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross receipts of any
retailer from the sale of tangible personal property sold at retail, or
stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political subdivision in
which the business is to be located or expanded, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The business offers primary jobs and is consistent with:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 25 –
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be
earlier than the date on which the Office received the application
and not later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves
the application;
(3) State that the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection;
(4) State that the business will offer primary jobs; and
(5) Bind the successors in interest of the business for the
specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, 5 or 6, the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
361.0687, if the business is a new business in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more or a city whose population is 60,000
or more, the business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 26 –
(1) The business will have 50 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$1,000,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 361.0687, if the
business is a new business in a county whose population is less than
100,000, in an area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more
that is located within the geographic boundaries of an area that is
designated as rural by the United States Department of Agriculture
and at least 20 miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area
designated as urban by the United States Department of Agriculture,
or in a city whose population is less than 60,000, the business meets
at least one of the following requirements:
(1) The business will have 10 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$250,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(h) If the business is an existing business, the business meets at
least one of the following requirements:
(1) For a business in:
(I) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (II),
a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city whose
population is 60,000 or more, the business will, by the eighth
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
-
*SB403_R2*

– 27 –
which the abatement becomes effective or by twenty-five
employees, whichever is greater, who will be employed at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective; or
(II) A county whose population is less than 100,000, an
area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more that is located
within the geographic boundaries of an area that is designated as
rural by the United States Department of Agriculture and at least 20
miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area designated as
urban by the United States Department of Agriculture, or a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the business will, by the
eighth calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by six employees,
whichever is greater, who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) The business will expand by making a capital investment
in this State, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective, in an amount equal to at
least 20 percent of the value of the tangible property possessed by
the business in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year
in which the abatement becomes effective, and the capital
investment will be in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective. The determination of the value of the tangible property
possessed by the business in the immediately preceding fiscal year
must be made by the:
(I) County assessor of the county in which the business
will expand, if the business is locally assessed; or
(II) Department, if the business is centrally assessed.
(i) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the business anticipates
hiring in this State by the eighth calendar quarter following the
calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective if the
Office approves the application.
(j) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the business
will have at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll of the
business by the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, the business, by
the earlier of the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
-
*SB403_R2*

– 28 –
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective or the date on
which the business has at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll
of the business, has a policy for paid family and medical leave and
agrees that all employees who have been employed by the business
for at least 1 year will be eligible for at least 12 weeks of paid
family and medical leave at a rate of at least 55 percent of the
regular wage of the employee. The business will agree in writing
that if the Office approves the application, the business will not:
(1) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee from taking paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(2) Discriminate, discipline or discharge an employee for
taking paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(3) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee or other person from bringing a proceeding or testifying
in a proceeding against the business for a violation of the policy for
paid family and medical leave that is required pursuant to this
paragraph.
3. For purposes of paragraph (j) of subsection 2, the Office of
Economic Development shall determine that a business meets the
requirements of that paragraph if the business has a policy for paid
family and medical leave for employees on the payroll of the
business outside of this State that meets or exceeds the requirements
for a policy for paid family and medical leave pursuant to that
paragraph and the business agrees in writing that its employees on
the payroll in this State are eligible for paid family and medical
leave under such policy.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office has requested a letter of
acknowledgment of the request for the abatement from any affected
county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided by
the business to its employees, the policy of paid family and medical
leave provided by the business to its employees, the projected
economic impact of the business and the projected tax revenue of
-
*SB403_R2*

– 29 –
the business after deducting projected revenue from the abated
taxes.
(c) May, if the Office determines that such action is necessary:
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a business that does not meet the requirements set
forth in paragraph (f), (g) or (h) of subsection 2;
(2) Make any of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)
to (h), inclusive, of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that a business must meet to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(d) May require the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 to incorporate a plan by the business to provide work-
based learning opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high
schools in this State, which may include, without limitation, a
proposal to offer work-based learning opportunities at the
business or to provide for employees of the business to serve as
full-time or part-time instructors for career and technical
education courses.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Office of
Economic Development shall not approve an application for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section if:
(a) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 70 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(c) The applicant intends to locate in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for locating that
business in that county.
(d) The applicant intends to expand in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for expanding
that business in that county.
(e) The applicant has changed the name or identity of the
business to evade the provisions of paragraph (c) or (d).
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Office of
Economic Development approves an application for a partial
-
*SB403_R2*

– 30 –
abatement pursuant to this section, in determining the types of taxes
imposed on a new or expanded business for which the partial
abatement will be approved and the amount of the partial abatement:
(a) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(b) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
7. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer.
8. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 2.
9. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
-
*SB403_R2*

– 31 –
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
10. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
11. A county treasurer:
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 10 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
12. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office of Economic Development determines to
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
NRS 360.755.
13. The Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment that a new business must make to
meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection
2; and
(2) Any security that a business is required to post to qualify
for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and NRS 360.755.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 32 –
14. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of Economic
Development may petition for judicial review in the manner
provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
15. For the purposes of this section, an employee is a “full-time
employee” if he or she is in a permanent position of employment
and works an average of 30 hours per week during the applicable
period set forth in subsection 2.
Sec. 15. NRS 360.753 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.753 1. An owner of a business or a person who intends
to locate or expand a business in this State may apply to the Office
of Economic Development pursuant to this section for a partial
abatement of one or more of:
(a) The personal property taxes imposed on an aircraft and the
personal property used to own, operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft; and
(b) The local sales and use taxes imposed on the purchase of
tangible personal property used to operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary
and except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the Office
of Economic Development shall approve an application for a partial
abatement if the Office makes the following determinations:
(a) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the business will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is issued pursuant
to subsection 5, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office, which must be not less than 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection; and
(4) Binds any successor in interest of the applicant for the
specified period;
(b) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtaining a valid business license and all
-
*SB403_R2*

– 33 –
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates;
(c) The business owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft;
(d) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to
its employees in this State during the period of partial abatement is
not less than 100 percent of the average statewide hourly wage as
established by the Employment Security Division of the Department
of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal
year;
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office;
(f) If the business is:
(1) A new business, that it will have five or more full-time
employees on the payroll of the business within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement; or
(2) An existing business, that it will increase its number of
full-time employees on the payroll of the business in this State by 3
percent or three employees, whichever is greater, within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(g) The business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will make a new capital investment of at
least $250,000 in this State within 1 year after receiving its
certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(2) The business will maintain and possess in this State
tangible personal property having a value of not less than
$5,000,000 during the period of partial abatement;
(3) The business develops, refines or owns a patent or other
intellectual property, or has been issued a type certificate by the
Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 21; and
(h) If the application is for the partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application has
been approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
Board of Economic Development created by NRS 231.033.
3. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall approve or deny an application submitted pursuant to
this section and notify the applicant of its decision not later than 45
days after receiving the application.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 34 –
(b) Must not:
(1) Consider an application for a partial abatement unless the
Office has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for
the partial abatement from any affected county, school district, city
or town and has complied with the requirements of NRS 360.757; or
(2) Approve a partial abatement for any applicant for a
period of more than 10 years.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, may
require the agreement described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2
to incorporate a plan by the business to provide work-based
learning opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high schools in
this State, which may include, without limitation, a proposal to
offer work-based learning opportunities at the business or to
provide for employees of the business to serve as full-time or part-
time instructors for career and technical education courses.
4. The Office of Economic Development must not approve a
partial abatement of personal property taxes for a business whose
physical property is collectively valued and centrally assessed
pursuant to NRS 361.320 and 361.3205.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
partial abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from personal property taxes, the
appropriate county treasurer.
6. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 2.
7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
8. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and whose partial abatement is in effect
ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
-
*SB403_R2*

– 35 –
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from personal property taxes, to the appropriate
county treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed pursuant to this section before the failure of the business to
comply unless the Nevada Tax Commission determines that the
business has substantially complied with the requirements of this
section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320,
the business shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement
required to be repaid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the
amount due at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have been
made had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
10. The Nevada Tax Commission may adopt such regulations
as the Commission determines are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
11. An applicant for a partial abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
a court of competent jurisdiction to review the decision in the
manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Aircraft” means any fixed-wing, rotary-wing or unmanned
aerial vehicle.
(b) “Component of an aircraft” means any:
(1) Element that makes up the physical structure of an
aircraft, or is affixed thereto;
(2) Mechanical, electrical or other system of an aircraft,
including, without limitation, any component thereof; and
(3) Raw material or processed material, part, machinery,
tool, chemical, gas or equipment used to operate, manufacture,
service, maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or
component of an aircraft.
(c) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a permanent
position of employment and works an average of 30 hours per week
during the applicable period set forth in subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 2.
(d) “Local sales and use taxes” means any taxes imposed on the
gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in any
political subdivision of this State, except the taxes imposed by the
Sales and Use Tax Act.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 36 –
(e) “Personal property taxes” means any taxes levied on
personal property by the State or a local government pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS.
Sec. 16. NRS 360.754 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.754 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a data
center in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the new or expanded data center
pursuant to chapter 361 or 374 of NRS.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The application is consistent with the State Plan for
Economic Development developed by the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
231.053 and any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office of Economic Development which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office of Economic
Development, which must not be earlier than the date on which the
Office received the application and not later than 1 year after the
date on which the Office approves the application;
(3) State that the data center will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office of Economic Development, which
must be at least 10 years, and will continue to meet the eligibility
requirements set forth in this subsection; and
(4) Bind the successors in interest of the applicant for the
specified period.
(c) The applicant is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by each county, city or town in which the
data center operates.
(d) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement for a period of
not more than 10 years, the applicant meets the following
requirements:
(1) The data center will, by not later than the date that is 5
years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, have
or have added 10 or more full-time employees who are residents of
Nevada and who will be employed at the data center and will
continue to employ 10 or more full-time employees who are
-
*SB403_R2*

– 37 –
residents of Nevada at the data center until at least the date which is
10 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing or expanding the data center will require the
data center or any combination of the data center and one or more
colocated businesses to make in each county in this State in which
the data center is located, by not later than the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, a
cumulative capital investment of at least $25,000,000 in capital
assets that will be used or located at the data center.
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the data
center to its employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the
average statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year and:
(I) The data center will, by not later than the date which is
2 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
provide a health insurance plan for all employees employed at the
data center that includes an option for health insurance coverage for
dependents of the employees; and
(II) The health care benefits provided to employees
employed at the data center will meet the minimum requirements for
health care benefits established by the Office of Economic
Development by regulation pursuant to subsection 13.
(4) At least 50 percent of the employees engaged in the
construction of the data center are residents of Nevada, unless
waived by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of
the Office of Economic Development that there is an insufficient
number of residents of Nevada available and qualified for such
employment.
(e) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement for a period of
10 years or more but not more than 20 years, the applicant meets the
following requirements:
(1) The data center will, by not later than the date that is 5
years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, have
or have added 50 or more full-time employees who are residents of
Nevada and who will be employed at the data center and will
continue to employ 50 or more full-time employees who are
residents of Nevada at the data center until at least the date which is
20 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing or expanding the data center will require the
data center or any combination of the data center and one or more
colocated businesses to make in each county in this State in which
the data center is located, by not later than the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, a
-
*SB403_R2*

– 38 –
cumulative capital investment of at least $100,000,000 in capital
assets that will be used or located at the data center.
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the data
center to its employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the
average statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year and:
(I) The data center will, by not later than the date which is
2 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
provide a health insurance plan for all employees employed at the
data center that includes an option for health insurance coverage for
dependents of the employees; and
(II) The health care benefits provided to employees
employed at the data center will meet the minimum requirements for
health care benefits established by the Office of Economic
Development by regulation pursuant to subsection 13.
(4) At least 50 percent of the employees engaged in the
construction of the data center are residents of Nevada, unless
waived by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of
the Office of Economic Development that there is an insufficient
number of residents of Nevada available and qualified for such
employment.
(f) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the data center anticipates
hiring in this State if the Office of Economic Development approves
the application.
(g) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application has
been approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
Board of Economic Development created by NRS 231.033.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office of Economic Development
has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for the
abatement from each affected county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided to
employees employed at the data center, the projected economic
impact of the data center and the projected tax revenue of the data
center after deducting projected revenue from the abated taxes.
(c) May, if the Office of Economic Development determines
that such action is necessary:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 39 –
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a data center that does not meet the requirements
set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 2;
(2) Make the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d) and (e)
of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that an applicant must meet
to qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(d) May require the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 to incorporate a plan by the data center to provide
work-based learning opportunities to pupils enrolled in public
high schools in this State, which may include, without limitation, a
proposal to offer work-based learning opportunities at the data
center or to provide for employees of the data center to serve as
full-time or part-time instructions or career and technical
education courses.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of each county
in which the data center is or will be located.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office may also approve a partial abatement of taxes for each
colocated business that enters into a contract to use or occupy, for a
period of at least 2 years, all or a portion of the new or expanded
data center. Each such colocated business shall obtain a state
business license issued by the Secretary of State. The percentage
amount of a partial abatement approved for a colocated business
pursuant to this subsection must not exceed the percentage amount
of the partial abatement approved for the data center. The duration
of a partial abatement approved for a colocated business pursuant to
this subsection must not exceed the duration of the contract or
contracts entered into between the colocated business and the data
center, including the duration of any contract or contracts extended
or renewed by the parties. If a colocated business ceases to meet the
requirements set forth in this subsection, the colocated business
shall repay the amount of the abatement that was allowed in the
same manner in which a data center is required by subsection 8 to
repay the Department or a county treasurer. If a data center ceases to
meet the requirements of subsection 2 or ceases operation before the
time specified in the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
-
*SB403_R2*

– 40 –
subsection 2, any partial abatement approved for a colocated
business ceases to be in effect, but the colocated business is not
required to repay the amount of the abatement that was allowed
before the date on which the abatement ceases to be in effect. A data
center shall provide the Executive Director of the Office and the
Department with a list of the colocated businesses that are qualified
to receive a partial abatement pursuant to this subsection and shall
notify the Executive Director within 30 days after any change to the
list. The Executive Director shall provide the list and any updates to
the list to the Department and the county treasurer of each affected
county.
6. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or a data center whose partial abatement is in effect shall, upon the
request of the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies of all
records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the requirements
of subsection 2.
7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
8. If a data center whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the data center shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the data center to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the data center has substantially
complied with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the data center shall, in
addition to the amount of the partial abatement required to be repaid
pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the
rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each
month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the month following
the period for which the payment would have been made had the
partial abatement not been approved until the date of payment of the
tax.
9. A county treasurer:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 41 –
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 5 or 8 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
10. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of Economic
Development may petition for judicial review in the manner
provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
11. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, a data center must maintain the
following documents in the personnel file of the employee:
(a) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is a full-time employee; and
(d) Proof that the employee is covered by the health insurance
plan which the data center is required to provide pursuant to sub-
subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of subsection
2 or sub-subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (e) of
subsection 2.
12. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive Director
of the Office of Economic Development any waiver of the
requirements set forth in subparagraph (4) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 2 or subparagraph (4) of paragraph (e) of subsection 2, a
data center must submit to the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development written documentation of the efforts to
meet the requirements and documented proof that an insufficient
number of Nevada residents is available and qualified for
employment.
13. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall adopt regulations relating to the minimum level of
health care benefits that a data center must provide to its employees
to meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of
subsection 2;
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Office determines to
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section; and
(c) Shall not approve any application for a partial abatement
submitted pursuant to this section which is received on or after
January 1, 2036.
14. The Nevada Tax Commission:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 42 –
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment necessary to meet the requirement
set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 2; and
(2) Any security that a data center is required to post to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
15. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Colocated business” means a person who enters into a
contract with a data center that is qualified to receive an abatement
pursuant to this section to use or occupy all or part of the data
center.
(b) “Data center” means one or more buildings located at one or
more physical locations in this State which house a group of
networked server computers for the purpose of centralizing the
storage, management and dissemination of data and information
pertaining to one or more businesses and includes any modular or
preassembled components, associated telecommunications and
storage systems and, if the data center includes more than one
building or physical location, any network or connection between
such buildings or physical locations.
(c) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a permanent
position of employment and works an average of 30 hours per week
during the applicable period set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of
subsection 2.
Sec. 17. NRS 360.759 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.759 1. A production company that produces a qualified
production in this State in whole or in part may apply to the Office
of Economic Development for a certificate of eligibility for
transferable tax credits for any qualified direct production
expenditures. The transferable tax credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed pursuant to chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. The Office may approve an application for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits if the Office finds that the
production company producing the qualified production qualifies for
the transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office
approves the application, the Office shall calculate the estimated
-
*SB403_R2*

– 43 –
amount of the transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7592,
360.7593 and 360.7594.
3. To be eligible for transferable tax credits pursuant to this
section, a production company must:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 4;
(b) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office that the qualified
production is in the economic interest of the State;
(c) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office that 70 percent or
more of the funding for the qualified production has been obtained;
(d) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office that at least 60
percent of the direct production expenditures for:
(1) Preproduction;
(2) Production; and
(3) If any direct production expenditures for postproduction
will be incurred in this State, postproduction,
 of the qualified production will be incurred in this State as
qualified direct production expenditures;
(e) Not later than 270 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production or, if any direct production
expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this State, not
later than 270 days after the completion of postproduction, unless
the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 90 days,
provide the Office with an audit of the qualified production that
includes an itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
(1) Shows that the qualified production incurred qualified
direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more; and
(2) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
(f) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (e);
(g) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to include:
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production, a
logo of this State provided by the Office which indicates that the
qualified production was filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada;
or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
production which indicates that the qualified production was filmed
or otherwise produced in Nevada; and
(h) Meet any other requirements prescribed by regulation
pursuant to this section.
4. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must
contain:
-
*SB403_R2*

– 44 –
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) A summary of the budgeted expenditures for the entire
production, including projected expenditures to be incurred outside
of Nevada;
(e) Details regarding the financing of the project, including,
without limitation, any information relating to a binding financing
commitment, loan application, commitment letter or investment
letter;
(f) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(g) The business address of the production company;
(h) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance;
(i) Proof that the production company has secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production will be produced; and
(j) Any other information required by regulations adopted by the
Office pursuant to subsection [8.] 9.
5. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 3, the Office may require a production company to
enter into an agreement with the Office that incorporates a plan
by the production company to provide work-based learning
opportunities to pupils enrolled in public high schools in this
State, which may include, without limitation, a proposal to offer
work-based learning opportunities with the qualified production
or to provide for employees of the production company to serve as
full-time or part-time instructors for career and technical
education courses.
6. If the Office approves an application for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a copy of the certificate of
eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the tax credits
available pursuant to NRS 360.7592 to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
[6.] 7. Within 60 business days after receipt of an audit
provided by a production company pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 3 and any other accountings or other information
required by the Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify
the audit and make a final determination of whether a certificate of
transferable tax credits will be issued. If the Office certifies the
-
*SB403_R2*

– 45 –
audit, determines that all other requirements for the transferable tax
credits have been met and determines that a certificate of
transferable tax credits will be issued, the Office shall notify the
production company that the transferable tax credits will be issued.
Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the production
company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
transferable tax credits that will be applied to each fee or tax set
forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all of the credits which
will be issued. Upon receipt of the declaration, the Office shall issue
to the production company a certificate of transferable tax credits in
the amount approved by the Office for the fees or taxes included in
the declaration of the production company. The production company
shall notify the Office upon transferring any of the transferable tax
credits. The Office shall notify the Department and the Nevada
Gaming Control Board of all transferable tax credits issued,
segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, and the
amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
[7.] 8. An applicant for transferable tax credits pursuant to this
section shall, upon the request of the Executive Director of the
Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of all records
necessary to verify that the applicant meets the requirements of
subsection 3.
[8.] 9. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) Any additional requirements to receive transferable tax
credits;
(2) Any additional qualified expenditures or production costs
that may serve as the basis for transferable tax credits pursuant to
NRS 360.7591;
(3) Any additional information that must be included with an
application pursuant to subsection 4;
(4) The application review process;
(5) Any type of qualified production which, due to obscene
or sexually explicit material, is not eligible for transferable tax
credits; and
(6) The requirements for notice pursuant to NRS 360.7595;
and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive.
[9.] 10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 46 –
Sec. 18. NRS 360.888 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.888 “Qualified project” means a project which the Office
of Economic Development determines meets all the requirements
set forth in subsections 2, 3, [5 and] 4, 6 and 7 of NRS 360.889.
Sec. 19. NRS 360.889 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.889 1. On behalf of a project, the lead participant in the
project may apply to the Office of Economic Development for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to:
(1) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(2) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(3) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(4) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) A partial abatement of property taxes, employer excise taxes
or local sales and use taxes, or any combination of any of those
taxes.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and the partial abatement
of the taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead
participant in the project must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection [5;] 6;
(b) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that
approval of the application would promote the economic
development of this State and aid the implementation of the State
Plan for Economic Development developed by the Executive
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project collectively will make a total new capital
investment of at least $1 billion in this State within the 10-year
period immediately following approval of the application;
(d) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project are engaged in a common business
purpose or industry;
(e) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
place of business of each participant is or will be located within the
geographic boundaries of the project site or sites;
(f) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or commits to obtaining a valid business license and all other
permits required by the county, city or town in which the project
operates;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 47 –
(g) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of employees engaged in the construction of the project;
(h) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of qualified employees employed or anticipated to be
employed at the project by the participants;
(i) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
employer engaged in the construction of the project provides a plan
of health insurance and that each employee engaged in the
construction of the project is offered coverage under the plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer;
(j) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project provides a plan of health insurance and that
each employee employed at the project by each participant is
offered coverage under the plan of health insurance provided by his
or her employer;
(k) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that at least
50 percent of the employees engaged in construction of the project
and 50 percent of the employees employed at the project are
residents of Nevada, unless waived by the Executive Director of the
Office upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of the
Office that there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment;
(l) Agree to provide the Office with a full compliance audit of
the participants in the project at the end of each fiscal year which:
(1) Shows the amount of money invested in this State by
each participant in the project;
(2) Shows the number of employees engaged in the
construction of the project and the number of those employees who
are residents of Nevada;
(3) Shows the number of employees employed at the project
by each participant and the number of those employees who are
residents of Nevada; and
(4) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
(m) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (l);
(n) Enter into an agreement with the governing body of the city
or county in which the qualified project is located that:
(1) Requires the lead participant to pay the cost of any
engineering or design work necessary to determine the cost of
infrastructure improvements required to be made by the governing
body pursuant to an economic development financing proposal
approved pursuant to NRS 360.990; and
(2) Requires the lead participant to seek reimbursement for
any costs paid by the lead participant pursuant to subparagraph (1)
from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to NRS 360.991; and
-
*SB403_R2*

– 48 –
(o) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
3. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, for a project located on more than one site in this State
to be eligible for the partial abatement of the taxes described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead participant must, on behalf of
the project, submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection [5] 6 on or before June 30, 2019, and provide
documentation satisfactory to the Office that:
(a) The initial project will have a total of 500 or more full-time
employees employed at the site of the initial project and the average
hourly wage that will be paid to employees of the initial project in
this State is at least 120 percent of the average statewide hourly
wage as established by the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1
of each fiscal year;
(b) Each participant in the project must be a subsidiary or
affiliate of the lead participant; and
(c) Each participant offers primary jobs and:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
satisfies the requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.750, regardless of whether the business is a new business
or an existing business; and
(2) If a participant owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft, that the participant satisfies the applicable
requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.753.
 If any participant is a data center, as defined in NRS 360.754, any
capital investment by that participant must not be counted in
determining whether the participants in the project collectively will
make a total new capital investment of at least $1 billion in this
State within the 10-year period immediately following approval of
the application, as required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, the Office may require the lead participant in the
project, on behalf of the project, to enter into an agreement with
the Office that incorporates a plan by the participants in the
project to provide work-based learning opportunities to pupils
enrolled in public high schools in this State, which may include,
without limitation, a proposal to offer work-based learning
opportunities at the project or to provide for employees of the
participants to serve as full-time or part-time instructors for career
and technical education courses.
5. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, a project is eligible for the transferable tax credits
-
*SB403_R2*

– 49 –
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 only if the Interim
Finance Committee approves a written request for the issuance of
the transferable tax credits. Such a request may only be submitted
by the Office and only after the Office has approved the application
submitted for the project pursuant to subsection 2. The Interim
Finance Committee may approve a request submitted pursuant to
this subsection only if the Interim Finance Committee determines
that approval of the request:
(a) Will not impede the ability of the Legislature to carry out its
duty to provide for an annual tax sufficient to defray the estimated
expenses of the State for each fiscal year as set forth in Article 9,
Section 2 of the Nevada Constitution; and
(b) Will promote the economic development of this State and
aid the implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development
developed by the Executive Director of the Office pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
[5.] 6. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) A detailed description of the project, including a description
of the common purpose or business endeavor in which the
participants in the project are engaged;
(b) A detailed description of the location of the project,
including a precise description of the geographic boundaries of the
project site or sites;
(c) The name and business address of each participant in the
project, which must be an address in this State;
(d) A detailed description of the plan by which the participants
in the project intend to comply with the requirement that the
participants collectively make a total new capital investment of at
least $1 billion in this State in the 10-year period immediately
following approval of the application;
(e) If the application includes one or more partial abatements, an
agreement executed by the Office with the lead participant in the
project not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the partial abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the project will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is approved
pursuant to NRS 360.893, continue in operation in this State for a
period specified by the Office; and
-
*SB403_R2*

– 50 –
(4) Binds successors in interest of the lead participant for the
specified period; and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
[6.] 7. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada
for the purposes of this section, each participant in the project must
maintain the following documents in the personnel file of the
employee:
(a) A copy of the:
(1) Current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee originally issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles
more than 60 days before the hiring of the employee or a current and
valid identification card for the employee originally issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles more than 60 days before the hiring
of the employee; or
(2) If the employee is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States, a current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee or a current and valid identification card for the employee
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is employed full-time and scheduled
to work for an average minimum of 30 hours per week; and
(d) Proof that the employee is offered coverage under a plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer.
[7.] 8. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive
Director of the Office any waiver of the requirement set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2, the lead participant in the project
must submit to the Executive Director of the Office written
documentation of the efforts to meet the requirement and
documented proof that an insufficient number of Nevada residents is
available and qualified for employment.
[8.] 9. The Executive Director of the Office shall make
available to the public and post on the Internet website of the Office:
(a) Any request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2; and
(b) Any approval of such a request for a waiver that is granted
by the Executive Director of the Office.
[9.] 10. The Executive Director of the Office shall post a
request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of
subsection 2 on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days after
receiving the request and shall keep the request posted on the
Internet website for not less than 5 days. The Executive Director of
the Office shall ensure that the Internet website allows members of
the public to post comments regarding the request.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 51 –
[10.] 11. The Executive Director of the Office shall consider
any comments posted on the Internet website concerning any
request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of
subsection 2 before making a decision regarding whether to approve
the request. If the Executive Director of the Office approves the
request for a waiver, the Executive Director of the Office must post
the approval on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days and
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the approval.
[11.] 12. If an applicant for one or more partial abatements
pursuant to this section fails to execute the agreement described in
paragraph (e) of subsection [5] 6 within 1 year after the date on
which the application was received by the Office, the applicant shall
not be approved for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
unless the applicant submits a new application.
Sec. 20. NRS 360.891 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.891 1. If the Office of Economic Development approves
an application for a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS
360.889 and the Interim Finance Committee approves a written
request for the issuance of transferable tax credits pursuant to
subsection [4] 5 of NRS 360.889, the Office shall immediately
forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility which identifies the
estimated amount of the tax credits available pursuant to this section
to:
(a) The lead participant in the qualified project;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
2. Within 14 business days after receipt of an audit provided by
the lead participant in the qualified project pursuant to paragraph (l)
of subsection 2 of NRS 360.889 and any other accountings or other
information required by the Office, the Office shall determine
whether to certify the audit and make a final determination of
whether a certificate of transferable tax credits will be issued. If the
Office certifies the audit and determines that all other requirements
for the transferable tax credits have been met, the Office shall notify
the lead participant in the qualified project that the transferable tax
credits will be issued. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice,
the lead participant in the qualified project shall make an irrevocable
declaration of the amount of transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3)
of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 360.889, thereby
accounting for all of the credits which will be issued. Upon receipt
of the declaration, the Office shall issue to the lead participant a
certificate of transferable tax credits in the amount approved by the
-
*SB403_R2*

– 52 –
Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration. The lead
participant shall notify the Department upon transferring any of the
transferable tax credits. The Office shall notify the Department and
the Nevada Gaming Control Board of all transferable tax credits
issued, segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subparagraphs (1),
(2) and (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 360.889. The
Department shall notify the Office and the Nevada Gaming Control
Board of the amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
3. A qualified project may be approved for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits in the amount of $9,500 for
each qualified employee, up to a maximum of 4,000 qualified
employees.
4. For the purpose of computing the amount of transferable tax
credits for which a qualified project is eligible pursuant to
subsection 3:
(a) Each qualified employee must be:
(1) Employed by a participant at the site of the qualified
project.
(2) Employed full-time and scheduled to work for an average
minimum of 30 hours per week.
(3) Employed for at least the last 3 consecutive months of the
fiscal year.
(4) Offered coverage under a plan of health insurance
provided by his or her employer.
(b) The wages for federal income tax purposes reported or
required to be reported on Form W-2 of the qualified employees of
the qualified project must be paid at an average rate of $22 per hour.
(c) An employee engaged solely in the construction of the
qualified project is deemed not to be a qualified employee.
Sec. 21. NRS 360.894 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.894 1. The lead participant in a qualified project shall,
upon the request of the Office of Economic Development, furnish
the Office with copies of all records necessary to verify that the
qualified project meets the eligibility requirements for any
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS 360.891 and the
partial abatement of any taxes pursuant to NRS 360.893.
2. The lead participant shall repay to the Department or the
Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any portion of the
transferable tax credits to which the lead participant is not entitled
if:
(a) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
make the investment in this State necessary to support the
determination by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development that the project is a qualified project;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 53 –
(b) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
employ the number of qualified employees identified in the
certificate of eligibility approved for the qualified project;
(c) The lead participant submits any false statement,
representation or certification in any document submitted for the
purpose of obtaining transferable tax credits; or
(d) The lead participant otherwise becomes ineligible for
transferable tax credits after receiving the transferable tax credits
pursuant to NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive.
3. Transferable tax credits purchased in good faith are not
subject to forfeiture unless the transferee submitted fraudulent
information in connection with the purchase.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or chapter 361
of NRS, if the lead participant in a qualified project for which a
partial abatement has been approved pursuant to NRS 360.893 and
is in effect:
(a) Fails to meet the requirements for eligibility pursuant to that
section; or
(b) Ceases operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (e) of subsection [5] 6 of NRS 360.889,
 the lead participant shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement is from the property tax imposed by chapter 361 of NRS,
to the appropriate county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed to the lead participant pursuant to NRS
360.893 before the failure of the lead participant to meet the
requirements for eligibility. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
360.232 and 360.320, the lead participant shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be repaid by the lead
participant pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount
due from the lead participant at the rate most recently established
pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the
last day of the month following the period for which the payment
would have been made had the partial abatement not been approved
until the date of payment of the tax.
5. The Secretary of State may, upon application by the
Executive Director of the Office, revoke or suspend the state
business license of the lead participant in a qualified project which
is required to repay any portion of transferable tax credits pursuant
to subsection 2 or the amount of any partial abatement pursuant to
subsection 4 and which the Office determines is not in compliance
with the provisions of this section governing repayment. If the state
business license of the lead participant in a qualified project is
suspended or revoked pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary of
State shall provide written notice of the action to the lead
participant. The Secretary of State shall not reinstate a state business
-
*SB403_R2*

– 54 –
license suspended pursuant to this subsection or issue a new state
business license to the lead participant whose state business license
has been revoked pursuant to this subsection unless the Executive
Director of the Office provides proof satisfactory to the Secretary of
State that the lead participant is in compliance with the requirements
of this section governing repayment.
Sec. 22. NRS 360.940 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.940 “Qualified project” means a project which the Office
of Economic Development determines meets all the requirements
set forth in subsections 2 [, 3 and 4] to 5, inclusive, of NRS
360.945.
Sec. 23. NRS 360.945 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.945 1. On behalf of a project, the lead participant in the
project may apply to the Office of Economic Development for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to:
(1) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(2) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(3) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(4) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) An abatement of property taxes, employer excise taxes or
local sales and use taxes, or any combination of any of those taxes.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and abatement of the
taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead participant
in the project must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 3;
(b) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that
approval of the application would promote the economic
development of this State and aid the implementation of the State
Plan for Economic Development developed by the Executive
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project collectively will make a total new capital
investment of at least $3.5 billion in this State within the 10-year
period immediately following approval of the application;
(d) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project are engaged in a common business
purpose or industry;
(e) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
place of business of each participant is or will be located within the
geographic boundaries of the project site;
-
*SB403_R2*

– 55 –
(f) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or commits to obtaining a valid business license and all other
permits required by the county, city or town in which the project
operates;
(g) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of employees engaged in the construction of the project;
(h) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of qualified employees employed or anticipated to be
employed at the project by the participants;
(i) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
employer engaged in the construction of the project provides a plan
of health insurance and that each employee engaged in the
construction of the project is offered coverage under the plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer;
(j) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project provides a plan of health insurance and that
each employee employed at the project by each participant is
offered coverage under the plan of health insurance provided by his
or her employer;
(k) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that at least
50 percent of the employees engaged in construction of the project
and 50 percent of the employees employed at the project are
residents of Nevada, unless waived by the Executive Director of the
Office upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of the
Office that there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment;
(l) Agree to provide the Office with a full compliance audit of
the participants in the project at the end of each fiscal year which:
(1) Shows the amount of money invested in this State by
each participant in the project;
(2) Shows the number of employees engaged in the
construction of the project and the number of those employees who
are residents of Nevada;
(3) Shows the number of employees employed at the project
by each participant and the number of those employees who are
residents of Nevada; and
(4) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
(m) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (l);
(n) Enter into an agreement with the governing body of the city
or county in which the qualified project is located that:
(1) Requires the lead participant to pay the cost of any
engineering or design work necessary to determine the cost of
infrastructure improvements required to be made by the governing
-
*SB403_R2*

– 56 –
body pursuant to an economic development financing proposal
approved pursuant to NRS 360.990; and
(2) Requires the lead participant to seek reimbursement for
any costs paid by the lead participant pursuant to subparagraph (1)
from the proceeds of bonds of the State of Nevada issued pursuant
to NRS 360.991; and
(o) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
3. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) A detailed description of the project, including a description
of the common purpose or business endeavor in which the
participants in the project are engaged;
(b) A detailed description of the location of the project,
including a precise description of the geographic boundaries of the
project site;
(c) The name and business address of each participant in the
project, which must be an address in this State;
(d) A detailed description of the plan by which the participants
in the project intend to comply with the requirement that the
participants collectively make a total new capital investment of at
least $3.5 billion in this State in the 10-year period immediately
following approval of the application;
(e) If the application includes one or more abatements, an
agreement executed by the Office with the lead participant in the
project not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States that the project will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the abatement is approved pursuant to
NRS 360.965, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office; and
(3) Binds successors in interest of the lead participant for the
specified period; and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, the Office may require the lead participant in the
project, on behalf of the project, to enter into an agreement with
the Office that incorporates a plan by the participants in the
project to provide work-based learning opportunities to pupils
enrolled in public high schools in this State, which may include,
without limitation, a proposal to offer work-based learning
opportunities at the project or to provide for employees of the
participants to serve as full-time or part-time instructors for career
and technical education courses.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 57 –
5. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, each participant in the project must
maintain the following documents in the personnel file of the
employee:
(a) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is employed full-time and scheduled
to work for an average minimum of 30 hours per week; and
(d) Proof that the employee is offered coverage under a plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer.
[5.] 6. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive
Director of the Office any waiver of the requirement set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2, the lead participant in the project
must submit to the Executive Director of the Office written
documentation of the efforts to meet the requirement and
documented proof that an insufficient number of Nevada residents is
available and qualified for employment.
[6.] 7. The Executive Director of the Office shall make
available to the public and post on the Internet website for the
Office:
(a) Any request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2; and
(b) Any approval of such a request for a waiver that is granted
by the Executive Director of the Office.
[7.] 8. The Executive Director of the Office shall post a
request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of
subsection 2 on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days after
receiving the request and shall keep the request posted on the
Internet website for not less than 5 days. The Executive Director of
the Office shall ensure that the Internet website allows members of
the public to post comments regarding the request.
[8.] 9. The Executive Director of the Office shall consider any
comments posted on the Internet website concerning any request for
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 before making a decision regarding whether to approve the
request. If the Executive Director of the Office approves the request
for a waiver, the Executive Director of the Office must post the
approval on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days and
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the approval.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 58 –
[9.] 10. If an applicant for one or more abatements pursuant to
this section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (e)
of subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for
an abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant submits a
new application.
Sec. 24. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for one staff position
to oversee the implementation of recommendations made by the
Commission on Innovation and Excellence in Education pursuant to
NRS 385.920 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $68,910
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $68,910
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 25. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of
$2,250,000 to enter into a contract with a qualified entity to:
(a) Provide professional development to teachers and
administrators regarding the implementation of personalized,
competency-based learning programs and the redesign of schools
and school cultures to create higher-performing programs of
personalized, competency-based learning; and
(b) Assist the Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education in developing recommendations pursuant to NRS
385.920 and assist the Department in implementing such
recommendations.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
-
*SB403_R2*

– 59 –
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 25.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for personnel and
operating costs to carry out the provisions of this act the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $222,763
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $279,956
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 26. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education created by NRS 385.910 for travel expenses of the
members of the Commission and the members of the Subcommittee
on Metrics created by section 1 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $25,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $25,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 27.5. NRS 389.210 and 389.230 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 28. 1. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 18 to 21, inclusive, of this act expire by limitation
on June 30, 2032.
3. Section 15 of this act expires by limitation on June 30, 2035.
-
*SB403_R2*

– 60 –
4. Sections 22 and 23 of this act expire by limitation on
June 30, 2036.
5. Sections 8.5 and 16 of this act expire by limitation on
December 31, 2056.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
389.210 Establishment of pilot program to provide
competency-based education; regulations; requirements for
schools selected to participate in program.
1. The Department shall establish a pilot program to provide
competency-based education.
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe:
(a) The process for submission of an application by the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter school
to participate in the pilot program; and
(b) The qualifications and conditions for participation by a
school in the pilot program, including, without limitation:
(1) A commitment by the school district or charter school to
implement competency-based education for not less than 5 years;
and
(2) Evidence of support for the implementation of
competency-based education by the community served by the
school district or charter school.
3. A school selected to participate in the pilot program to
provide competency-based education shall:
(a) Implement a system of instruction by which a pupil advances
to a higher level of learning when the pupil demonstrates mastery of
a concept or skill;
(b) Establish concrete skills on which a pupil will be evaluated
that include explicit, measurable and transferable learning
objectives;
(c) Ensure that assessment is a meaningful and positive learning
experience for pupils;
(d) Ensure that pupils receive timely and differentiated support
based upon their individual learning needs; and
(e) Ensure that pupils are able to apply knowledge learned,
create new knowledge and develop important skills and dispositions
relating to such knowledge.
4. If at least one application to participate in the pilot program
is made on behalf of a school that primarily serves pupils who are at
risk or credit deficient, or in need of credit retrieval, the Department
-
*SB403_R2*

– 61 –
must select at least one such school to participate in the pilot
program.
5. As used in this section, a pupil is “at risk” if the pupil has an
economic or academic disadvantage such that he or she requires
special services and assistance to enable him or her to succeed in
educational programs. The term includes, without limitation, pupils
who are members of economically disadvantaged families, pupils
who are English learners, pupils who are at risk of dropping out of
high school and pupils who do not meet minimum standards of
academic proficiency. The term does not include a pupil with a
disability.
389.230 Public campaign to raise awareness; meetings to
inform superintendents of school districts; distribution of
available money to carry out program.
1. The Department of Education shall:
(a) Conduct a public campaign to raise awareness about
competency-based education.
(b) Conduct one or more meetings with the superintendents of
the school districts for the purpose of increasing:
(1) Understanding of competency-based education; and
(2) Interest in implementing a system of competency-based
education.
2. To the extent that money is available for that purpose, the
Department of Education may, through a competitive grants
program, distribute any money appropriated to the Department to
carry out the pilot program to provide competency-based education
established pursuant to NRS 389.210. Grants must be awarded by
the Department to schools selected to participate in the program
based upon money available for this purpose.
H
-
*SB403_R2*